fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX c5 Y 152
SFX c5 er er/n'q'd'm't's' er
SFX c5 er ant/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçant/m'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeant/m'q'l't's' eger
SFX c5 ebrer ebre/n'q'j'm't's' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer ece/n'q'j'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 echer eche/n'q'j'm't's' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecre/n'q'j'm't's' ecrer
SFX c5 eder ede/n'q'j'm't's' eder
SFX c5 eger ege/n'q'j'm't's' eger
SFX c5 egler egle/n'q'j'm't's' egler
SFX c5 egner egne/n'q'j'm't's' egner
SFX c5 egrer egre/n'q'j'm't's' egrer
SFX c5 eguer egue/n'q'j'm't's' eguer
SFX c5 eler ele/n'q'j'm't's' eler
SFX c5 emer eme/n'q'j'm't's' emer
SFX c5 ener ene/n'q'j'm't's' ener
SFX c5 eper epe/n'q'j'm't's' eper
SFX c5 equer eque/n'q'j'm't's' equer
SFX c5 erer ere/n'q'j'm't's' erer
SFX c5 eser ese/n'q'j'm't's' eser
SFX c5 eter ete/n'q'j'm't's' eter
SFX c5 etrer etre/n'q'j'm't's' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evre/n'q'j'm't's' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eye/n'q'j'm't's' eyer
SFX c5 ebrer ebres/n'm't' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer eces/n'm't' ecer
SFX c5 echer eches/n'm't' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecres/n'm't' ecrer
SFX c5 eder edes/n'm't' eder
SFX c5 eger eges/n'm't' eger
SFX c5 egler egles/n'm't' egler
SFX c5 egner egnes/n'm't' egner
SFX c5 egrer egres/n'm't' egrer
SFX c5 eguer egues/n'm't' eguer
SFX c5 eler eles/n'm't' eler
SFX c5 emer emes/n'm't' emer
SFX c5 ener enes/n'm't' ener
SFX c5 eper epes/n'm't' eper
SFX c5 equer eques/n'm't' equer
SFX c5 erer eres/n'm't' erer
SFX c5 eser eses/n'm't' eser
SFX c5 eter etes/n'm't' eter
SFX c5 etrer etres/n'm't' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evres/n'm't' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eyes/n'm't' eyer
SFX c5 er ons/n't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçons/n't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeons/n't' eger
SFX c5 er ez/n'm' er
SFX c5 ebrer ebrent/n'q'm't's' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer ecent/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 echer echent/n'q'm't's' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecrent/n'q'm't's' ecrer
SFX c5 eder edent/n'q'm't's' eder
SFX c5 eger egent/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 egler eglent/n'q'm't's' egler
SFX c5 egner egnent/n'q'm't's' egner
SFX c5 egrer egrent/n'q'm't's' egrer
SFX c5 eguer eguent/n'q'm't's' eguer
SFX c5 eler elent/n'q'm't's' eler
SFX c5 emer ement/n'q'm't's' emer
SFX c5 ener enent/n'q'm't's' ener
SFX c5 eper epent/n'q'm't's' eper
SFX c5 equer equent/n'q'm't's' equer
SFX c5 erer erent/n'q'm't's' erer
SFX c5 eser esent/n'q'm't's' eser
SFX c5 eter etent/n'q'm't's' eter
SFX c5 etrer etrent/n'q'm't's' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evrent/n'q'm't's' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eyent/n'q'm't's' eyer
SFX c5 er ais/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçais/n'j'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeais/n'j'm't' eger
SFX c5 er ait/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçait/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeait/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 er ions/n't' er
SFX c5 er iez/n'm' er
SFX c5 er aient/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçaient/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeaient/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 er ai/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçai/n'j'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeai/n'j'm't' eger
SFX c5 er as/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eças/n'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeas/n'm't' eger
SFX c5 er a/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eça/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egea/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 er ames/n't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçames/n't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeames/n't' eger
SFX c5 er ates/n'm' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçates/n'm' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeates/n'm' eger
SFX c5 er erent/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 er erai/n'j'm't' er
SFX c5 er eras/n'm't' er
SFX c5 er era/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 er erons/n't' er
SFX c5 er erez/n'm' er
SFX c5 er eront/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 er erais/n'j'm't' er
SFX c5 er erait/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 er erions/n't' er
SFX c5 er eriez/n'm' er
SFX c5 er eraient/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 er asse/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçasse/n'j'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeasse/n'j'm't' eger
SFX c5 er asses/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçasses/n'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeasses/n'm't' eger
SFX c5 er at/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçat/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeat/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 er assions/n't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçassions/n't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeassions/n't' eger
SFX c5 er assiez/n'm' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçassiez/n'm' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeassiez/n'm' eger
SFX c5 er assent/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçassent/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeassent/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 ebrer ebre/n'm' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer ece/n'm' ecer
SFX c5 echer eche/n'm' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecre/n'm' ecrer
SFX c5 eder ede/n'm' eder
SFX c5 eger ege/n'm' eger
SFX c5 egler egle/n'm' egler
SFX c5 egner egne/n'm' egner
SFX c5 egrer egre/n'm' egrer
SFX c5 eguer egue/n'm' eguer
SFX c5 eler ele/n'm' eler
SFX c5 emer eme/n'm' emer
SFX c5 ener ene/n'm' ener
SFX c5 eper epe/n'm' eper
SFX c5 equer eque/n'm' equer
SFX c5 erer ere/n'm' erer
SFX c5 eser ese/n'm' eser
SFX c5 eter ete/n'm' eter
SFX c5 etrer etre/n'm' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evre/n'm' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eye/n'm' eyer
SFX c5 er ons/n' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eçons/n' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeons/n' eger
SFX c5 er ez/n' er

SFX d0 N 82
SFX d0 er ant er
SFX d0 eter ette jeter
SFX d0 eter ette [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elle ppeler
SFX d0 eler elle [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter ettes jeter
SFX d0 eter ettes [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elles ppeler
SFX d0 eler elles [^p].eler
SFX d0 er ons er
SFX d0 er ez er
SFX d0 eter ettent jeter
SFX d0 eter ettent [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellent ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellent [^p].eler
SFX d0 er ais er
SFX d0 er ait er
SFX d0 er ions er
SFX d0 er iez er
SFX d0 er aient er
SFX d0 er ai er
SFX d0 er as er
SFX d0 er a er
SFX d0 er ames er
SFX d0 er ates er
SFX d0 er erent er
SFX d0 eter etterai jeter
SFX d0 eter etterai [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerai ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerai [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etteras jeter
SFX d0 eter etteras [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleras ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleras [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter ettera jeter
SFX d0 eter ettera [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellera ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellera [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etterons jeter
SFX d0 eter etterons [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerons ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerons [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etterez jeter
SFX d0 eter etterez [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerez ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerez [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etteront jeter
SFX d0 eter etteront [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleront ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleront [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etterais jeter
SFX d0 eter etterais [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerais ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerais [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etterait jeter
SFX d0 eter etterait [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerait ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerait [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etterions jeter
SFX d0 eter etterions [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerions ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerions [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etteriez jeter
SFX d0 eter etteriez [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleriez ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleriez [^p].eler
SFX d0 eter etteraient jeter
SFX d0 eter etteraient [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleraient ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleraient [^p].eler
SFX d0 er asse er
SFX d0 er asses er
SFX d0 er at er
SFX d0 er assions er
SFX d0 er assiez er
SFX d0 er assent er
SFX d0 eter ette jeter
SFX d0 eter ette [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elle ppeler
SFX d0 eler elle [^p].eler
SFX d0 er ons er
SFX d0 er ez er

SFX d1 Y 83
SFX d1 er er/n'q'd' er
SFX d1 er ant/n'q' er
SFX d1 eter ette/n'q'j' jeter
SFX d1 eter ette/n'q'j' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler elle/n'q'j' ppeler
SFX d1 eler elle/n'q'j' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter ettes/n' jeter
SFX d1 eter ettes/n' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler elles/n' ppeler
SFX d1 eler elles/n' [^p].eler
SFX d1 er ons/n' er
SFX d1 er ez/n' er
SFX d1 eter ettent/n'q' jeter
SFX d1 eter ettent/n'q' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler ellent/n'q' ppeler
SFX d1 eler ellent/n'q' [^p].eler
SFX d1 er ais/n'j' er
SFX d1 er ait/n'q' er
SFX d1 er ions/n' er
SFX d1 er iez/n' er
SFX d1 er aient/n'q' er
SFX d1 er ai/n'j' er
SFX d1 er as/n' er
SFX d1 er a/n'q' er
SFX d1 er ames/n' er
SFX d1 er ates/n' er
SFX d1 er erent/n'q' er
SFX d1 eter etterai/n'j' jeter
SFX d1 eter etterai/n'j' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler ellerai/n'j' ppeler
SFX d1 eler ellerai/n'j' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter etteras/n' jeter
SFX d1 eter etteras/n' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler elleras/n' ppeler
SFX d1 eler elleras/n' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter ettera/n'q' jeter
SFX d1 eter ettera/n'q' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler ellera/n'q' ppeler
SFX d1 eler ellera/n'q' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter etterons/n' jeter
SFX d1 eter etterons/n' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler ellerons/n' ppeler
SFX d1 eler ellerons/n' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter etterez/n' jeter
SFX d1 eter etterez/n' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler ellerez/n' ppeler
SFX d1 eler ellerez/n' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter etteront/n'q' jeter
SFX d1 eter etteront/n'q' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler elleront/n'q' ppeler
SFX d1 eler elleront/n'q' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter etterais/n'j' jeter
SFX d1 eter etterais/n'j' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler ellerais/n'j' ppeler
SFX d1 eler ellerais/n'j' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter etterait/n'q' jeter
SFX d1 eter etterait/n'q' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler ellerait/n'q' ppeler
SFX d1 eler ellerait/n'q' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter etterions/n' jeter
SFX d1 eter etterions/n' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler ellerions/n' ppeler
SFX d1 eler ellerions/n' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter etteriez/n' jeter
SFX d1 eter etteriez/n' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler elleriez/n' ppeler
SFX d1 eler elleriez/n' [^p].eler
SFX d1 eter etteraient/n'q' jeter
SFX d1 eter etteraient/n'q' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler elleraient/n'q' ppeler
SFX d1 eler elleraient/n'q' [^p].eler
SFX d1 er asse/n'j' er
SFX d1 er asses/n' er
SFX d1 er at/n'q' er
SFX d1 er assions/n' er
SFX d1 er assiez/n' er
SFX d1 er assent/n'q' er
SFX d1 eter ette/n' jeter
SFX d1 eter ette/n' [^j]eter
SFX d1 eler elle/n' ppeler
SFX d1 eler elle/n' [^p].eler
SFX d1 er ons/n' er
SFX d1 er ez/n' er
